Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-824.02
Frivolous actions; actual attorney's fee; effect of award; stipulations authorized.

Nothing in sections 25-824 to 25-824.03 shall be construed to prevent an attorney and his or her client from negotiating the actual fee which the client is to pay the attorney. Nothing in such sections shall be intended to limit the authority of the court to approve written stipulations filed with the court or oral stipulations in open court agreeing to no award of attorney's fees or costs or an award of attorney's fees or costs in a manner different than that provided in such sections.

Laws 1987, LB 261, § 3.